Washington statutes.
RCW 7.105.315

Duration of full protection orders—Other than for extreme risk protection orders.

(1) When issuing an order after notice to the respondent and a hearing, the court may either grant relief for a fixed period of time or enter a permanent order of protection. Other than for antiharassment orders, the court shall not grant relief for less than one year unless the petitioner has specifically requested relief for a shorter period of time.

(2)(a) If a protection order restrains the respondent from contacting the respondent's minor children, the restraint must be for a fixed period not to exceed one year. This limitation is not applicable to protection orders issued under chapter 26.09, 26.26A, or 26.26B RCW.

(b) If the petitioner has petitioned for relief on behalf of the respondent's minor children, the court shall advise the petitioner that if the petitioner wants to continue protection for a period beyond one year, the petitioner may either petition for renewal pursuant to the provisions of this chapter or may seek relief pursuant to the provisions of chapter 26.09, 26.26A, or 26.26B RCW.

[ 2021 c 215 s 40.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.